Georgia statutes. TITLE 26 Food, Drugs, and Cosmetics
Article 6 Meat, Poultry, and Dairy Processing Plants

Cross references.

Authority of Commissioner of Agriculture to impose penalty in lieu of other action, §

2-2-10

.

Hatchery operators and dealers, T. 4, C. 7.

Regulation of sanitary conditions of meat, poultry, and dairy processing plants, §

26-2-200

et seq.

26-2-200.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Agriculture.

“Meat” or “meat products” means the carcass or part of any carcass of any animal or fowl or any by-product thereof in any form.

“Meat, poultry, or dairy processing plant” means: any abattoir, slaughterhouse, poultry killing or processing plant, milk depot, milk processing plant, or any other establishment for the killing, storage, dressing, manufacture, preparation, or processing of any animal, fowl, or dairy product or any by-product thereof for human consumption.

“Person” means any person, firm, corporation, or association of persons, or combination thereof.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 748, § 1.

26-2-201.
Supervision and control of sanitary conditions in dairies and meat, poultry, and dairy processing plants; designation of inspectors.

The Commissioner shall have supervision and control over the sanitary conditions of all dairies and meat, poultry, or dairy processing plants in this state.

The Commissioner shall maintain an adequate system of inspection and shall employ or designate qualified personnel to assist in the administration of this article. He shall fix the compensation of all personnel employed by him.

The Commissioner is also vested with the authority to designate licensed veterinarians and city or county health authorities as inspectors as he deems advisable.

History.

Ga. L. 1914, p. 148, § 1; Code 1933, §§ 42-401, 42-402; Ga. L. 1956, p. 748, §§ 2, 10.

26-2-202.
Promulgation of rules and regulations.

The Commissioner is authorized to adopt rules and regulations to carry out this article.

The Commissioner shall adopt sanitary standards and specifications that are not less than those recognized and approved by the United States Department of Agriculture or the United States Department of Health and Human Services for like products and premises.

History.

Ga. L. 1914, p. 148, § 1; Code 1933, § 42-401; Ga. L. 1956, p. 748, § 3.

26-2-203.
Power of inspection.

In the performance of his duties, the Commissioner or any of his duly authorized representatives is authorized to enter and inspect, at any reasonable time, any dairy, or any meat, poultry, or dairy processing plant, or any vehicle where any dairy, animal, or poultry product, any by-product thereof, or any part thereof is held, stored, transported, or offered for sale.

History.

Ga. L. 1914, p. 148, § 3; Code 1933, § 42-403; Ga. L. 1956, p. 748, § 8; Ga. L. 2003, p. 140, § 26.

26-2-204.
Inspection of dairy, meat, or poultry plants; correction of unsanitary conditions; take and test samples; evidentiary value thereof.

The Commissioner shall cause to be inspected at such times as he may deem proper each dairy and each meat, poultry, or dairy processing plant within this state. He shall require the correction of all unsanitary conditions found therein. He may take samples of dairy, poultry, or meat products or parts or portions thereof and cause them to be analyzed or tested by the state chemist. Such analyses or test records shall be preserved by the Commissioner and when sworn to by the state chemist shall be prima-facie evidence of violations of this article, rules and regulations, or standards or specifications adopted pursuant to this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1914, p. 148, § 3; Code 1933, § 42-403; Ga. L. 1956, p. 748, § 7.

26-2-205.
Wholesomeness inspection of meat, poultry, and dairy products offered for sale; inspection of livestock slaughtered; marking system for inspection purposes; standards and specifications; exception.

The Commissioner is authorized to adopt and maintain an adequate system of wholesomeness inspection as to all meat, poultry, or dairy products offered for sale in this state. He shall be authorized to employ or designate qualified personnel necessary to maintain such inspection program. The Commissioner is authorized to require an ante mortem and post-mortem inspection of all livestock slaughtered by licensees under this article for sale as food in this state. He shall be authorized to adopt an appropriate marking system so as to identify those carcasses of animals inspected and passed as fit for human consumption. The Commissioner is authorized to adopt standards and specifications for meat, poultry, and dairy products and the processing thereof. Nothing contained in this Code section shall be applicable to any person slaughtering livestock or poultry or processing meat, poultry, or dairy products for home consumption.

History.

Ga. L. 1959, p. 168, § 1.

26-2-206.
Wholesomeness inspection of meat, poultry, or dairy processing plants on cost basis or less.

The Commissioner is authorized to make the wholesomeness inspection provided in Code Section 26-2-205 available to meat, poultry, or dairy processing plants licensed under this article on the basis of actual costs. He is further authorized when sufficient funds are available to make such service available without cost.

History.

Ga. L. 1959, p. 168, § 2.

26-2-207.
Dairy equipment and premises to be maintained in clean and sanitary condition; supply of clean, pure water; adequate drainage.

No person shall operate a dairy within this state unless the equipment and premises shall be maintained in a clean and sanitary condition. Each dairy shall have an adequate supply of clean, pure water and an adequate supply of clean, hot water and adequate drainage of the premises.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 748, § 4.

26-2-208.
Sale, offer for sale, or possession of dairy, animal, or poultry products, under other than sanitary conditions; when conditions other than sanitary deemed to exist.

No person, firm, or corporation shall sell, offer for sale, or have in his possession for sale any dairy, animal, or poultry product or any by-product thereof that has been produced, manufactured, transported, handled, stored, or processed under other than sanitary conditions.

Conditions other than sanitary shall be deemed to exist where any or all of the following conditions exist:

Premises, buildings, handling or storage space, or equipment, in a state of decay;

Floors and side walls or other parts of any space of building covered or coated with decaying matter;

Sufficient insect screens not provided or maintained;

Insufficient drainage;

Inadequate supply of pure water;

Inadequate supply of hot water;

Any animal or fowl held on the premises in unsanitary lots, pens, or cages or fed uncooked animal offal; or

Where putrid odors exist.

The enumeration of these conditions shall not be exclusive and the Commissioner shall determine whether unsanitary conditions exist.

History.

Ga. L. 1914, p. 148, § 2; Code 1933, § 42-402; Ga. L. 1956, p. 748, § 6.

26-2-209.
Permanent license for meat processing plants; revocation or suspension; notice and hearing.

To assure the protection of the consuming public, no person shall operate a meat processing plant in this state without having first obtained a permanent license from the Commissioner; provided, however, that any meat processing plant operating under a federal grant of inspection from the United States Department of Agriculture, Food Safety Inspection Service, shall be exempt from such license requirement. There shall be no fee for such license. The license shall be kept on file in each place of business. The license shall not be transferable. The Georgia Department of Agriculture may refuse to grant inspection, and any such license may be revoked or suspended by the Commissioner for the violation of this article or rules and regulations or sanitary standards and specifications adopted pursuant to this article. The Commissioner shall notify the licensee of the reasons why he or she intends to revoke or suspend the license, and the licensee shall be entitled to a hearing before the Commissioner within ten days after receipt of such notice of intention to revoke or suspend. At such hearing the Commissioner shall consider the circumstances and shall give the licensee reasonable time to correct the conditions or circumstances that caused the notice of intention to revoke or suspend the license to be given.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 748, § 5; Ga. L. 2007, p. 620, § 2/HB 433.

26-2-210.
Permanent license for poultry processing plants; filing at place of business; transferability; suspension or revocation; notice and hearing.

To assure the protection of the consuming public, no person shall operate a poultry processing plant in this state without having first obtained a permanent license from the Commissioner; provided, however, that any poultry processing plant operating under a federal grant of inspection from the United States Department of Agriculture, Food Safety Inspection Service, shall be exempt from such license requirement. There shall be no fee for such license. The license shall be kept on file in each place of business. The license shall not be transferable. The Georgia Department of Agriculture may refuse to grant inspection, and any such license may be revoked or suspended by the Commissioner for the violation of this article or rules and regulations or sanitary standards and specifications adopted pursuant to this article. The Commissioner shall notify the licensee of the reasons why he or she intends to revoke or suspend the license, and the licensee shall be entitled to a hearing before the Commissioner within ten days after receipt of such notice of intention to revoke or suspend. At such hearing the Commissioner shall consider the circumstances and shall give the licensee reasonable time to correct the conditions or circumstances that caused the notice of intention to revoke or suspend the license to be given.

History.

Ga. L. 1970, p. 186, § 1; Ga. L. 2007, p. 620, § 3/HB 433.

26-2-211.
Statistics on animals and poultry slaughtered; maintenance of records.

The Commissioner shall maintain a system by which accurate statistics regarding the disposition of all animals or poultry slaughtered for human consumption in this state by licensees may be obtained. He shall require that each licensee maintain adequate records so as to ascertain the total number of animals or poultry slaughtered, processed, or disposed of and the amount of meat, poultry, or dairy products received or processed by him.

History.

Ga. L. 1914, p. 148, § 4; Code 1933, § 42-405; Ga. L. 1956, p. 748, § 9.

26-2-212.
County and municipal ordinances dealing with meats, poultry, and dairy products.

Nothing in this article shall prevent the governing authority of any county or municipal corporation from adopting ordinances or resolutions providing for the inspection of meats, poultry, meat or poultry food products, and dairy products sold within its limits and to provide penalties for violation thereof; but no such ordinance or resolution shall conflict with any power or authority of the Commissioner or his representatives; provided, however, that no county or municipal corporation shall adopt sanitary standards or specifications that are less than those adopted by the Commissioner.

History.

Ga. L. 1914, p. 148, § 5; Code 1933, § 42-406; Ga. L. 1956, p. 748, § 10.

26-2-213.
Injunctions.

In addition to the remedies provided in this article and notwithstanding the existence of any remedy at law, the Commissioner is authorized to apply to the superior court and such court shall have jurisdiction upon hearing and for cause shown to grant a temporary or permanent injunction, restraining order, or both, restraining any person from violating or continuing to violate this article or for failing or refusing to comply with the requirements of this article or any rule or regulation adopted by the Commissioner pursuant to this article. No ex parte restraining order shall be issued without bond.

History.

Ga. L. 1959, p. 168, § 3.

26-2-213.1.
Applicability to individuals and entities governed by federal acts.

The requirements of this article shall apply to persons, firms, corporations, establishments, animals, and articles regulated under the federal Meat Inspection Act, 21 U.S.C. Section 601, et seq., or the federal Poultry Products Inspection Act, 21 U.S.C. Section 451, et seq., only to the extent provided for in said federal acts. Consistent with said federal acts, the Commissioner may exercise concurrent jurisdiction with the secretary of agriculture of the United States and may enforce this article and any regulations promulgated pursuant thereto without regard to licensing agency.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-2-213.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2007, p. 620, § 4/HB 433.

26-2-214.
Inspection of federally inspected meat, poultry, or dairy products; exception for horse slaughter operations.

This article shall in no way be construed to apply or require further inspection of meat, poultry, or dairy products in this state when meat, poultry, or dairy products are required to be inspected by inspectors of the United States Department of Agriculture, provided the Georgia Department of Agriculture may inspect any business operations involving the slaughter of horses in this state for the purpose of selling or offering for sale the horse meat derived therefrom in order to enforce certain restrictions relating to such slaughter.

Any person, partnership, association, corporation, or firm violating this Code section, including but not limited to refusing to permit an inspection authorized by this Code section, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1959, p. 168, § 4; Ga. L. 1979, p. 846, § 2.

26-2-215.
Penalty.

Any person who violates this article or rules and regulations adopted under this article or any sanitary standards or specifications adopted under this article shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1914, p. 134, § 2; Code 1933, § 42-9908; Ga. L. 1956, p. 748, § 11.